Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 8

Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2014 [Repealed]

71-5-801. [Repealed.]

Acts 2014, ch. 877, § 1; repealed by terms of former §71-5-806, effective June 30, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 877, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 8 shall expire on June 30, 2015; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund.”

71-5-802. [Repealed.]

Acts 2014, ch. 877, § 1; repealed by terms of former § 71–5–806, effective June 30, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 877, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 8 shall expire on June 30, 2015; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund.”

71-5-803. [Repealed.]

Acts 2014, ch. 877, § 1; repealed by terms of former § 71–5–806, effective June 30, 2015..

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 877, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 8 shall expire on June 30, 2015; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund.”

71-5-804. [Repealed.]

Acts 2014, ch. 877, § 1; repealed by terms of former § 71–5–806, effective June 30, 2015..

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 877, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 8 shall expire on June 30, 2015; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund.”

71-5-805. [Repealed.]

Acts 2014, ch. 877, § 1; repealed by terms of former § 71–5–806, effective June 30, 2015..

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 877, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 8 shall expire on June 30, 2015; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund.”

71-5-806. [Repealed.]

Acts 2014, ch. 877, § 1; repealed by its own terms, effective June 30, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 877, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 8 shall expire on June 30, 2015; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund.”